Wyoming, session 2025, HB0300.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-24-101 through 39-24-111 are
created to read:

CHAPTER 24
TAX ON ELECTRICAL GENERATION
HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561

39-24-101. Definitions.

There are no specific applicable provisions for definitions
for this chapter.

39-24-102. Administration.

The department of revenue shall enforce this chapter. The
department shall promulgate rules necessary for the
implementation and enforcement of this chapter.

39-24-103. Imposition.

There is levied an excise tax upon the privilege of
producing and selling electricity in this state. The tax
shall be imposed upon the sale of any electricity produced
in Wyoming on or after January 1, 2026, and shall be paid
by the person producing the electricity. The tax shall be
imposed on the annual gross energy earnings from energy
produced in Wyoming.

39-24-104. Taxation rate.
HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561

The tax rate shall be three and one-half percent (3.5%) of
the annual gross energy earnings from energy produced in
this state.

39-24-105. Exemptions.

(a) No tax shall be imposed upon electricity that is
produced from any generating facility owned or operated by
the federal government or the state of Wyoming.

(b) No tax shall be imposed upon electricity that is
produced for the personal consumption of the producer,
including any excess production of electricity that does
not exceed five hundred (500) kilowatt hours in any
twenty-four (24) hour period.

39-24-106. Licensing; permits.

There are no specific applicable provisions for licenses
and permits for this chapter.

39-24-107. Compliance; collection procedures.
HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561

(a) Returns and reports. Any person producing
electricity for sale within this state that is subject to
the tax imposed by this chapter shall report:

(i) The annual gross energy earnings from energy
produced in Wyoming on or before February 1 of the year
immediately following the year in which the electricity was
produced;

(ii) Sales of electricity in Wyoming that are or
could be subject to sales or use tax under W.S. 39-15-103
or 39-16-103, regardless of any exemption that may apply to
sales of electricity. Sales of electricity shall be
reported by jurisdiction as required by rule of the
department.

(b) Payment. Any person owing a tax under this
chapter shall pay the tax one (1) time each year on or
before February 1 of the year immediately following the
year in which the electricity was produced. The tax shall
be collected by the department of revenue.

HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561
(c) Timelines. There are no specific applicable
provisions for timelines for this chapter.

39-24-108. Enforcement.

(a) Audits. There are no specific applicable
provisions for audits for this chapter.

(b) Interest. Interest at an annual rate equal to
the average prime interest as determined by the state
treasurer during the preceding fiscal year, plus four
percent (4%), shall be added to all delinquent taxes under
this chapter. To determine the average prime interest rate,
the state treasurer shall average the prime interest rate
for at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the thirty (30)
largest banks in the United States. The interest rate on
delinquent taxes shall be adjusted on January 1 of each
year following the year in which the taxes first became
delinquent. In no instance shall the delinquent interest
rate be less than twelve percent (12%) nor greater than
eighteen percent (18%).

(c) Penalties. The following shall apply:
HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561

(i) If any person fails to make or file a return
and remit the tax as required by W.S. 39-24-107, the
department shall impose a penalty of five percent (5%) of
the taxes due for each thirty (30) day period, or a
fraction thereof, elapsing between the due date of the
return and the date filed, unless the person for good cause
obtains from the department an extension of time for filing
before the due date for filing. In the event of an
extension, the person shall pay the interest due on
delinquent payments set forth in subsection (b) of this
section. In no event shall the total penalty imposed by
this paragraph exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax
due. The department, for good cause, may waive a penalty
imposed for failure to file a return for any one (1)
calendar year, provided that:

(A) The return was filed within five (5)
business days following the due date, including a due date
determined by an approved extension period; and

HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561
(B) The taxpayer requests the waiver in
writing within fifteen (15) days after the return was
filed, setting forth the reasons for the late filing.

(ii) If any part of a tax deficiency is due to
the negligence or intentional disregard of this chapter or
department rules there shall be added a penalty of five
percent (5%) of the amount of the deficiency plus interest
as provided by subsection (b) of this section. The taxes,
penalty and interest shall be paid by the taxpayer within
ten (10) days after receipt of notice and demand by the
department;

(iii) Taxes, interest, penalties and costs shall
be collectible by the department by appropriate judicial
proceedings;

(iv) The department may credit or waive
penalties imposed by this subsection as part of a
settlement or for any other good cause.

(d) Liens. Any delinquent tax is a lien upon the
property of any person owing tax under this chapter from
HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561
and after the time the tax is due until the tax is paid.
The tax lien shall have preference over all liens except
any valid mortgage or other liens of record filed or
recorded before the date the tax became due.

(e) Tax sales. There are no specific applicable
provisions for tax sales for this chapter.

39-24-109. Tax remedies.

(a) Credits. The following shall apply:

(i) Each taxpayer is entitled to a credit
against tax liability under this chapter for all excise,
sales, use, severance and ad valorem taxes paid in the tax
year by the same taxpayer to any taxing authority in
Wyoming. If the taxpayer produces electricity in this state
used in the production process of any mineral that is taxed
under the provisions of chapter 14 of this title, the
person producing the electricity shall be entitled to a
credit equal to the amount of the severance tax paid on the
minerals consumed in the production of the electricity;

HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561
(ii) To qualify for a credit under this
subsection for severance taxes paid by another person, the
person producing the electricity shall provide
documentation that adequately demonstrates, as determined
by department rules, the amount of taxes paid on the
minerals that were consumed in the production of the
electricity. The taxpayer shall report the credit to the
department on the return filed under W.S. 39-24-107;

(iii) In no case shall any refund be due or
payable if the amount of any credit claimed under this
section exceeds the amount of tax due under this chapter.

39-24-110. Statute of limitations.

There are no specific applicable provisions for a statute
of limitations for this chapter.

39-24-111. Distribution.

The electrical generation account is created. The proceeds
from the tax imposed by this chapter shall be deposited in
the account. All funds within the account shall be invested
HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561
by the state treasurer in accordance with law and all
investment earnings from the account shall be credited to
the account. It is the intent of the legislature that a
portion of the funds in the account be used to provide
payments to local governments for sales taxes that would
have been collected if sales of electricity reported under
W.S. 39-24-107(a)(ii) were subject to sales tax. Funds
within the account shall only be expended by legislative
appropriation.

Section 2. W.S. 39-11-101(a)(xviii),
39-15-103(a)(i)(E) and 39-15-105(a)(v) by creating a new
subparagraph (E) are amended to read:

39-11-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act unless otherwise specifically
provided:

(xviii) "This act" means W.S. 39-11-101 through
39-23-111 39-24-111.

39-15-103. Imposition.
HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561

(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:

(i) Except as provided by W.S. 39-15-105, there
is levied an excise tax upon:

(E) Except to the extent exempt under W.S.
39-15-105(a)(v)(E), the sales price paid to public
utilities as defined in W.S. 37-1-101 through 37-3-114 and
to persons furnishing gas, electricity or heat for
domestic, industrial or commercial consumption;

39-15-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:

(v) For the purpose of exempting sales of
services and tangible personal property which are
alternatively taxed, the following are exempt:

(E) Sales of electricity that are subject
to the tax in chapter 24 of this title.
HB0300

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0561

Section 3. The department of revenue shall adopt any
rules necessary to implement this act not later than July
1, 2025.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0300